BFN 

<F P=106> [Sichuan provincial government work report delivered by </F>
Sichuan Governor Xiao Yang before the Second Session of the 
Eighth Provincial People's Congress on 18 January: "Government 
Work Report"] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies, 
  On behalf of the provincial people's government, I now 
submit 
to the Second Session of the Eighth Provincial People's Congress 
the report on the work of the government for your examination 
and approval, and also for suggestions and comments from members 
of the Provincial Committee of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference [CPPCC] and other observers. 
<H5>  Review of Our Work in 1993 </H5>
  In 1993, under the guidance of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
remarks during his trip to southern China as well as the spirit 
of the 14th party congress, under the leadership of the Sichuan 
Provincial CPC Committee, and under the supervision and with the 
support of the provincial people's congress and the provincial 
CPPCC, the provincial people's government mobilized and 
organized the people of the entire province to uphold the 
party's basic line, further emancipate their minds, seize the 
favorable opportunity, intensify reform and opening up, and 
speed up economic development. As a result, we basically 
fulfilled the targets and tasks assigned by the First Session of 
the Eighth Provincial People's Congress. At present, the entire 
province is enjoying a sound economic growth, a stable political 
situation, general unity among nationalities, and social 
progress. Sichuan's reform, opening up, and modernization drive 
have now entered a new phase of accelerated development. 
  1. Center around economic construction, speed up the 
pace of economic development 
  With the aim of implementing the spirit of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's remarks during his trip to southern China, seizing 
the favorable opportunity, and expediting Sichuan's economic 
growth, the provincial people's government submitted to the 
provincial people's congress a grand program on realizing the 
second-step strategic goal three years in advance, which was 
adopted by the latter. Since then, an economic strategy which 
is characterized by the practice of "relying on science and 
education, readjusting the structure, integrating the Army with 
the people and urban areas with rural areas, being based on the 
Sichuan Basin, and developing two flanks" has been carried out 
in a comprehensive way; while a regional development arrangement 
which is characterized by "relying on two cities, paying 
attention to two lines, developing two flanks, and bringing 
along the development of the entire province" has also been 
worked out. In accordance with the principle of giving guidance 
to different types of areas, the provincial government has 
established different development plans, pillar industries, and 
policies and measures for different localities. The economy of 
the "one line" area, which spans Jiangyou to Emei Shan, is 
enjoying a rapid development; resettlement of residents in the 
Three Gorges Reservoir area has entered the stage of 
comprehensive action after undergoing successful experiments; 
and the Panxi area in southern Sichuan ranks among areas with 
the largest numbers of construction projects and the biggest 
amounts of investment. With the arduous efforts of the entire 
society and the people of the whole province, and also with the 
support of the People's Liberation Army troops stationed in the 
province, Sichuan has seen a rapid growth in its national 
economy, and its economic strength has been enhanced remarkably. 
The province's GDP in 1993 is estimated to reach 186 billion 
yuan, up by 12.8 percent over the previous year. 
  Persistent efforts were made to strengthen agriculture and 
rural work. Regarding agriculture as the foundation of our 
work, we conscientiously put into effect major policy decisions 
of the central authorities on strengthening agriculture; 
comprehensively carried out the principle of "never relaxing our 
efforts in grain production, actively promoting a diversified 
economy, and vigorously developing township and town 
enterprises"; unswervingly engaged in farmland capital 
construction; fought bravely against natural disasters; and 
strived to realize the goal of "stabilizing and increasing grain 
production and reducing burdens." The annual agricultural 
output value totaled 84.59 billion yuan in 1993, registering a 
1.5 percent increase; while the total output of grain reached 43 
million tonnes, which is slightly lower than the figure for the 
previous year. Animal husbandry, aquatic production, and 
forestry are all enjoying a good development momentum. The 
total annual output of pork, beef, and mutton reached 4.681 
million tonnes, an increase of 4.2 percent. Remarkable results 
have also been attained in building shelter-forest systems at 
the middle and upper reaches of the Chang Jiang, in building 
water-soil conservation works at the upper reaches of the Chang 
Jiang, in transforming low-yield farmland in central and eastern 
Sichuan, and in building production bases for quick-growing 
high-yield forests. Township and town enterprises are growing at 
a high speed. With a total output value of 191.87 billion yuan, 
which is 95 percent higher than that of the previous year, 
township and town enterprises have seen simultaneous growth in 
both sales revenue and total profits and taxes. Over 10 million 
peasants have left their homelands to seek employment or do 
business, among whom 5 million are working outside Sichuan, 
bringing back a great deal of experience and technology 
regarding developing a commodity economy as well as a big income 
from labor services. The rural cooperation foundation has 
undergone stable development, and the statutory burden of 
peasants across the province was controlled to within 5 percent 
of the net per capita income of the previous year. 
  Industrial production grew rapidly and economic efficiency 
increased. Sichuan seized the favorable development opportunity 
to readjust the product mix in light of market demand and to 
place the development of the pillar industries and leading 
production in an important position, stepped up production and 
development of marketable goods and new products, offered 
preferential policies to 152 efficient key enterprises which had 
sources of raw materials and whose products were marketable, and 
ensured the supply of working capital and energy. However, 
production of poorly managed enterprises whose products were 
unmarketable was limited. Relying on technical transformation 
and scientific and technological progress, Sichuan upgraded 
products and improved quality, opened up markets for products 
through various channels, made strenuous efforts to turn 
deficits into profits, alleviated the burdens on enterprises, 
and maintained sustained and rapid industrial growth. Output 
value of industry at and above the township level totaled 212.61 
billion yuan, an increase of 20.9 percent. Output value of 
sales totaled 204.28 billion yuan, up 21.2 percent. The 
production-sale rate topped 96.1 percent. Profits and taxes 
delivered by the budgetary industrial enterprises rose 43.7 
percent and the profit rate on costs went up 0.5 percentage 
points. The major industrial products increased by a wide 
margin. The ordnance enterprises accelerated the pace of their 
readjustment and transformation, increased the proportion of 
civilian goods, and produced a number of competitive leading 
products. 
  Investment in infrastructure rose normally and construction 
of key projects proceeded satisfactorily. Priority was given to 
transportation and communications building and efforts were made 
to open channels from Sichuan to other provinces. A framework 
of trunk lines gradually took shape within the province, 
presenting a favorable trend of comprehensive development of 
railway, highway, water, and air transportation. Construction 
of the Chengdu- Chongqing expressway, the Dacheng railway, and 
the double-track southern section of the Baoji-Chengdu railway, 
and electrification of the Chengdu-Kunming railway was smooth. 
The Longlu railway went into operation and progress in the 
expansion of the Shuangliu airport was smooth. Preparations 
were made for the Mianle high- grade highway. The Northern 
Sichuan and Southern Sichuan High-Grade Highways Shareholding 
Companies were established, and worked out plans for a number of 
transportation and communications projects. Focusing on 
transmission lines and programmed exchanges, we accelerated the 
pace of "building the framework and setting up the network" in 
communications and connected the Xian-Chengdu, Chengdu- Kunming, 
and Chengdu-Fanzhihua optical fiber lines. More than 200 cities 
at or above county level throughout the province had dialing 
telephones, of which 139 had direct long-distance call services 
and 66 had international long-distance call services. The 
second stage of the digital network project was completed. 
Energy construction was further strengthened. The Ertan Power 
Station smoothly dammed the river. The Tongjiezi, 
Huangjiaozhuan, and Fangang power stations went into operation 
on schedule. With the new installed capacity of 950,000 kw, 
Sichuan's total installed capacity exceeded 100 million kw. We 
accelerated the building of the Moqi gas field and development 
of the Junlian coal field. The province stepped up efforts to 
build the bases for essential raw materials. The 60,000- tonne 
polyester-sectioning project in Zigong, the 60,000-tonne sodium 
chloride project in east Sichuan, and the preparations for the 
240,000-tonne phosphate-ammonium fertilizer project in south 
Sichuan were developing in full swing. New headway was made in 
urban construction and building of towns. Output value of the 
building industry at and above township level totaled 30 billion 
yuan, an increase of 23 percent. The area of housing space 
completed was 52 million square meters, up 9 percent. 
  Sichuan vigorously developed tertiary industry and 
accelerated the building of the market system. Based on the 
principle of whoever makes the investment will benefit, the 
enthusiasm of all fields was aroused for running tertiary 
industry. The province implemented the policy of encouraging 
foreign investors in running tertiary industry. The development 
of Sino-foreign joint commercial and catering services showed a 
good momentum. A number of multifunctional wholesale markets 
and markets for production factors, which had large capacities 
and covered large areas, were built. The Sichuan Grain and 
Edible Oil Wholesale Market, Chongqing Means of Production 
Exchange, and Chengdu Metals Exchange started operation. The 
circulation channels were further widened. The volume of retail 
sales totaled 85.46 billion yuan, a rise of 18.8 percent. 
  The economy of the nationality areas developed healthily and 
new steps were taken in supporting the poor. Focused on the 
tasks of helping the poverty-stricken areas take the road to 
prosperity, Sichuan vigorously explored new roads for economic 
development of the nationality areas and the old bases and 
border regions, which were in straitened circumstances. Sichuan 
organized the relevant provincial departments to hold 
on-the-spot meetings to help the nationality areas resolve their 
difficulties in economic development. By relying on their own 
efforts and aid offered by various localities, the GNP, the 
total industrial output value and the total agricultural output 
value of the nationality areas increased by 9.6 percent, 20.8 
percent, and 5.5 percent respectively over the previous year. 
  Thanks to measures adopted to rectify the financial order, 
revenue increased. Sichuan strictly enforced the examination 
and approval procedures for tax exemption and introduced a new 
financial accounting system. Efforts were made to promote 
production, increase income, increase sources of income, levy 
taxes according to law, and prevent drains on revenue. 
Institutional purchases were kept strictly under control and 
nonproductive financial expenses were curtailed. Financial 
reform was deepened and preparations were made for implementing 
the revenue-sharing system. Revenue and expenditure were 
balanced in 1993, with revenue totaling 20.137 billion yuan, up 
37.1 percent from the previous year; and expenditure totaling 
21.4 billion yuan, up 31 percent. 
  Living standards of the urban and rural inhabitants 
continued 
to improve. The average living expenses income of urban 
inhabitants was 2,172.8 yuan, an increase of 20.2 percent over 
the previous year. It is estimated that the net average income 
of the peasants was 695 yuan, an increase of 61 yuan. Urban 
inhabitants had an average living space of 7.2 square meters, up 
0.2 square meters. The balance of inhabitants' savings deposits 
was 71.35 billion yuan, up 22.8 percent. 
  2. Intensify reform and open up wider 
  To meet the needs of the transition to a socialist market 
economy, deepen enterprise reform, and implement the "Enterprise 
Law," the "Regulations for State Industrial Enterprises To 
Effect a Change in Operational Mechanism," and Sichuan's 
"Methods for Implementation," the province paid attention to the 
22 large and medium-sized state enterprises undergoing the 
experiment of a new system and the 2,000 enterprises undergoing 
the experiment of three systems. In light of the state's 
standard opinions for trying out the shareholding system, 
Sichuan established 890 shareholding enterprises, of which 42 
were public utility companies. A good job was done in 
comprehensive rural reform. The Guanhan reform experiment area 
and the Yibin reform experiment invigorated the county-level 
economy and accelerated the growth of the county economy. 
Marked achievements were scored in reform experiments in the 
county organs. The province explored the road of reform in 
light of the principle of separating administration from 
management. 
  Opening up to the outside world was an important measure for 
expediting Sichuan's economic growth. We made friends with 
people all over the world and extended international cooperation 
and exchanges. Sichuan established relations of friendly ties 
with 33 cities of 14 countries and had trade contacts and 
cooperation with more than 120 countries and regions. We 
expanded the sphere for foreign investors, formulated policies 
for attracting foreign investment, did our utmost to improve the 
environment for foreign investment, and successfully held trade 
talks in Hong Kong, Thailand, Macao, and the ROK; sponsored 
Sichuan festivals in Moscow and Sofia; and took an active part 
in trade talks in Shenzhen. The external affairs, foreign 
propaganda, overseas Chinese affairs, Taiwan affairs, ports, 
customs, commercial inspection, border inspection, and civil 
aviation departments did a great deal of work to open Sichuan 
wider to the outside world. Shuangliu Airport was given 
approval to become an international airport. Under the 
conditions of the drastic changes taking place in the domestic 
and international markets, we made unremitting efforts to earn 
more foreign exchange through exports. The volume of Sichuan's 
imports and exports was $2.916 billion, up 32.6 percent. Of 
this, $1.65 billion was earned through exports, up 11 percent. 
There were 1,910 new foreign-funded enterprises during the 
year, involving agreed foreign capital of $2.4 billion. The 
province contracted foreign projects and labor services worth 
$600 million, up 17.6 percent. The volume of border trade 
reached 750 million yuan. Tourist facilities improved 
remarkably and so did services. The province earned $80.4 
million from tourism, up 16.2 percent. Inter-province economic 
and technical coordination further expanded. 3. Implement 
the measures of macroeconomic control and regulation, 
unswervingly uphold development 
  In connection with reality in Sichuan, we earnestly 
implemented the spirit of the "Opinions on the Current Economic 
Situation and Strengthening Macroeconomic Control and 
Regulation" promulgated by the CPC Central Committee and State 
Council; unswervingly adhered to development; switched the focus 
of economic work onto deepening reform, changing the operation 
mechanism, readjusting the structure, and increasing efficiency; 
and resolved prominent problems in economic life, particularly 
in banking work. 
  The province rectified the banking order, enforced banking 
discipline, resolutely implemented the regulations, and ensured 
the funds required for purchasing farm produce, working capital 
for major enterprises, technical transformation funds, funds for 
foreign trade enterprises and key construction projects, and 
funds for normal operation of the banks. As a result, the 
banking order improved remarkably, illegal lending was checked, 
the indiscriminate concentration of funds was curbed, the 
issuing of bonds was gradually standardized, all stock and 
equities were held in trust, and all spontaneous exchange 
markets were banned. The problem of issuing IOU notes was 
basically resolved, the funds for key construction projects were 
ensured, and the strain on working capital for key enterprises 
was eased somewhat. 
  Investment in fixed assets was brought under control and the 
key construction and technical transformation projects were 
ensured. The whole province curtailed 300 million yuan of 
investment in fixed assets. 
  Sichuan screened and rectified the development zones and 
the real estate market and checked the blind occupation of and 
speculation in land. The province reduced the development zones 
by 114, which involved a planned area of 481 square km and 
construction of 129 square km that had already started. Now the 
province has 52 development zones, of which four are 
state-level, 14 are provincial- level, and 34 are general-level 
development zones. Standard and legal management is exercised 
in these development zones. 
  We exercised strict control over price adjustment, 
established price adjustment funds and necessary reserves for 
sought-after commodities, made proper use of financial 
subsidies, adhered to the examination and approval system for 
the prices of essential means of production and consumer goods, 
and made efforts to curb spiraling prices. Initial results were 
achieved in checking the indiscriminate exaction of charges. 
The province abolished 1,740 kinds of irrational charges, 
suspended 64 kinds, and reduced 114 kinds of charges. 
  4. The strategy of revitalizing Sichuan with science 
was smoothly implemented and all kinds of social undertakings 
developed vigorously 
  The province studied, publicized, and implemented the "PRC 
Law on Scientific and Technological Progress" and vigorously 
implemented the 50 articles and supporting measures for 
revitalizing Sichuan with science and technology. The social 
mood of respecting qualified personnel and knowledge took shape. 
We implemented the principle of "stability and opening up" and 
deepened reform of the scientific and technological system. The 
province ran 6,890 various kinds of scientific and technological 
enterprises and implemented 168 scientific research projects, 
which turned out an output value of 7.51 billion yuan. Besides 
tackling key problems in a number of scientific and 
technological projects and importing technology, the province 
registered 745 major natural scientific and technological 
achievements during the year. Agricultural and rural science 
and technology were placed in the primary position in the 
province's scientific and technological work by tackling 25 key 
problems, trying out comprehensive technological development in 
55 townships, and implementing 23 spark projects. The 
agricultural popularization system developed in the direction of 
offering services in the entire course of production. Sichuan 
enhanced the technological development and assimilation capacity 
of enterprises, promoted enterprise technological progress, and 
developed 3,016 new products during the year. We vigorously 
developed high-tech industries; accelerated the building of the 
four high-tech technological development zones in Chengdu, 
Chongqing, Mianyang, and Zigong; and invested 1.575 billion 
yuan, which is estimated to add new capacity for turning out 
1.38 billion yuan of output value. The province nurtured and 
developed technological markets, and successfully held the 
Sichuan cross-strait economic and technological trade talks, the 
Macao new technology and new products fair, the new technology 
and new products trade talks of five provinces and seven sides 
along the Chang Jiang Valley, and the Sichuan youth scientific 
and technological achievements exposition. We attached 
importance to the scientific nature of policy decisions and the 
study of social science, upgraded the scientific policy 
decisionmaking level of the government, and prevented serious 
mistakes in policy decisionmaking. The protection of 
intellectual property rights was strengthened somewhat. 
  Earnestly implementing the "Outline for Chinese Education 
Reform and Development," Sichuan upheld the socialist 
orientation for running schools and improved education quality 
and school efficiency. Priority was given to basic education, 
with the stress on running well nine-year compulsory education. 
The provincial government issued a series of documents on 
continuously maintaining the ranks of primary school teachers, 
further improving management over levying surcharges on rural 
education, strengthening management over education funds in the 
remote border and nationality regions, and imposing education 
charges on guesthouses and hotels, and adopted resolute measures 
to resolve the problems of arrears in paying teachers, improving 
the conditions of schools and teachers' remuneration, 
maintaining the ranks of teachers, and arousing enthusiasm for 
teaching and educating students. There were 11 counties which 
passed the inspection on popularizing nine-year compulsory 
education. Sichuan reformed and developed higher education and 
readjusted the curriculum. Enrollment in ordinary institutions 
of higher learning rose 17 percent. The province deepened 
comprehensive reform of rural education and vigorously explored 
comprehensive reform of urban education. We paid attention to 
vocational and technical education, adult education, and 
education in areas inhabited by minority nationalities. 
  Sichuan continued the deepened reform of the cultural 
system, 
caused culture and art to flourish, raised the main theme of the 
times, and vigorously carried forward the outstanding culture of 
the Chinese nation. We sponsored the performance of national 
local operas (of southern areas), introduced the classical 
Chinese music concerts of the 20th century (in Chengdu and 
Chongqing), and organized literary and art performances to mark 
the centenary of Mao Zedong's birth. The province set up the 
Sichuan Cable Television Station, built the satellite receiving 
station, started broadcasting of the securities station, 
completed the radio project for the minority nationalities, and 
successfully sponsored the 1993 China Sichuan International 
Television Festival. We strengthened management over the 
cultural market and achieved results in the special struggle to 
wipe out pornography. We successfully sponsored the events of 
the Seventh National Games held in Sichuan. Sichuan's athletes 
scored good results at the Seventh National Games, ranking 
fifth, one grade higher than the previous year. 
  Upholding the policy of putting prevention first in medical 
work, the province improved the health of its people. We 
enormously enhanced rural health building and attained 
achievements in primary health care there. The occurrence and 
spread of diseases were brought under control and the rate of 
infectious and endemic diseases dropped. Thanks to the 
extensive activities of building health cities, Chengdu won the 
state health city title and Luzhou and Yibin won "10 best" 
national prefectural- and county-level health city titles. 
  The implementation of the three basic national policies of 
land protection, environmental protection, and family planning 
and the deepened reform of the land-use system brought about a 
halt in indiscriminate occupation and use of cultivated land, a 
rise in afforestation coverage, and improvement in the quality 
of the environment in some regions. The birth rate was 16.77 
per thousand and the natural growth rate 9.57 per thousand. 
  New headway was also made in press, publication, 
meteorology, 
mining, surveying, seismic, air defense, personnel, the elderly, 
statistics, archives, confidentiality, people's complaints, 
culture and history, and annals work. 
  5. Efforts were made to enhance social stability and 
the building of democracy and the legal system 
  Proceeding from the high plane of long-term stability, 
Sichuan strengthened the building of socialist democracy and the 
legal system. Thanks to the establishment and improvement of 
the democratic supervisory system and the system of making 
policy decisions democratically and scientifically, we 
implemented the regulations and resolutions of the provincial 
people's congress and its standing committee and consciously 
accepted the legal supervision by the provincial people's 
congress, its standing committee, and the people's deputies. 
Taking the initiative to maintain contacts with the CPPCC, 
democratic parties, figures without party affiliation, and 
people's organizations, we fully respected their right to 
participate in the deliberation and administration of state 
affairs and to exercise democratic supervision. While 
formulating our major policies or reform measures, we solicited 
the opinions of the provincial people's congress standing 
committee and the provincial CPPCC standing committee in 
advance. Government leaders went deep into the grass- roots 
level to attentively listen to criticism of government work and 
proposals made by the people's deputies and CPPCC members. We 
also took note of giving full play to the role of advisers and 
scientific and technical advisory groups. 
  Focused on economic construction, deepened reform, and 
opening up, we strengthened administrative legislation work. We 
organized the drafting of 11 local regulations and 21 provincial 
government regulations and submitted them to the provincial 
people's congress for examination and approval. At the same 
time, the government strengthened supervision over the 
enforcement of law and punished major lawless behavior. Focused 
on delegating powers to enterprises and alleviating the 
peasants' burden, the governments at all levels seized upon the 
complaints made by the masses, examined themselves, and boldly 
corrected lawless behavior. The measures adopted to check the 
8,985 cases of indiscriminate exaction of charges and pooling of 
funds not only safeguarded the legitimate rights and interests 
of enterprises and the masses but also impelled the 
administrative organs to exercise administration according to 
law. To promptly discover, correct, and check administrative 
interference by administrative organs in enterprises, the Legal 
System Bureau of the provincial government set up check posts in 
368 enterprises to monitor conditions in administrative law 
enforcement. The province enhanced auditing and economic 
supervision, administrative reconsideration and litigation work. 
Thanks to the drive to popularize law and enhance the sense of 
law, solicitor, notary, and other legal service work developed 
somewhat. 
  The province comprehensively tackled social order, did a 
good 
job of people's mediation work, mitigated social contradictions, 
and appropriately handled sudden events. Giving full play to 
the role of the public security and judicial organs and 
cooperating closely with the procuratorial organs, the province 
launched special struggles against highway robbers, production 
and trading of fake and counterfeit goods, and prostitution; 
sternly cracked down on criminal and economic offenses; smashed 
criminal gangs seriously endangering social order; and arrested 
and sentenced a number of criminals who had done all kinds of 
evil. As a consequence, social order gradually took a turn for 
the better. Safety and fire prevention work was also stepped up. 
  Building of the organs of power at the basic level and the 
mass autonomy organizations was enhanced. Centered on relief 
work, full play was given to the steady mechanism role of the 
civil administrative departments. 
  Thanks to the earnest implementation of the party's 
religious 
policies, the province ensured freedom of belief, effectively 
resisted infiltration by foreign hostile forces, and safeguarded 
nationality unity and social stability. 
  The province seriously implemented the "Sichuan Regulations 
for Conducting Education in National Defense," carried out the 
activities of supporting the Army and giving preferential 
treatment to families of revolutionary armymen and martyrs and 
supporting the Army and cherishing the people, enhanced the 
unity between Army and government and between the Army and the 
people, strengthened Army building, and did a good job of the 
militia reserve force. 
  6. The running of clean administration was 
strengthened and the building of spiritual civilization 
developed healthily 
  In light of the plan of the CPC Central Committee, the State 
Council, and the provincial party committee, anticorruption 
struggles were launched in a deep-going manner. Resolutely 
implementing the "three do not's" for state functionaries and 
five- point regulations for government working personnel at 
above county (department) level, measures were adopted for them 
to examine and correct their problems. A large number of major 
and important cases were investigated and handled, a number of 
corrupt elements were punished, and all this was made public to 
society. There were phased achievements in specially dealing 
with unhealthy tendencies in the taxation, public security, 
state land, education, public health, transportation, railway, 
electricity, post and telecommunications, and banking trades. 
Indiscriminate charges collected by administrative institutions 
were screened and rectified. The province resolutely 
implemented the stipulation of the central authorities banning 
administrative law enforcement organs and offices from engaging 
in business and running enterprises. The economic entities run 
by governments were separated from the former organs in terms of 
functions, finance, personnel, and titles. A system of running 
clean administration was established and improved. Target 
management was exercised and assessment of political 
achievements was strengthened for the work of provincial organs. 
  Centered on the general goal of the modernization program 
and 
the building of spiritual civilization in the nineties, Sichuan 
brought the building of spiritual civilization into line with 
the economic and social development plan; unswervingly launched 
education in building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the four cardinal principles, patriotism and national 
conditions, and socialist market economy; extensively carried 
out mass activities of building spiritual civilization, and 
initially fostered the ideological guarantees, spiritual forces, 
intellectual support, and media environment favorable to reform, 
opening up, and economic construction. 
  We owe the achievements attained in national economic and 
social development over the past year to the guidance of Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, the correct leadership of the CPC Central 
Committee, the State Council, and Sichuan CPC Committee, the 
vigorous support of the troops stationed in Sichuan, and the 
concerted efforts of the Army and the people of the whole 
province. On behalf of the provincial government, I would like 
to extend my heartfelt thanks and regards to the people of all 
nationalities throughout the province, people's deputies, CPPCC 
members, cadres at all levels, the armed forces stationed in 
Sichuan, the officers and men of the armed police and public 
security organs, democratic parties, figures from various 
circles, and friends abroad! 
  Amid rapid economic growth and social progress, we also 
encountered a series of outstanding problems: The prominent 
problems in infrastructure and the "bottlenecks" in basic 
industries; the slow progress in structural readjustment; the 
lack of staying power in agriculture and low comparable 
interests; state enterprises lacking vitality and suffering from 
huge deficits; the great demand for but short supply of capital; 
economic relations which are not yet straightened out; the low 
efficiency of the national economy as a whole; the relatively 
high level of retail prices; and the factors of instability in 
society. These problems are due to our failure to go deep into 
the realities of life to conduct investigations; arouse the 
masses to offer suggestions for the outstanding problems in our 
work; implement the major policy decisions regarding economic 
development; open up wider to the outside world; and promptly 
handle the problems complained of by the masses. The provincial 
government, which attaches great importance to these problems, 
is now studying ways to gradually resolve them. 
<H5>  Opinions on the Work for 1994 </H5>
  The year 1994 will be a crucial one for establishing a 
socialist market economic system as well as an important one for 
Sichuan to attain the second-step strategic objective three 
years ahead of schedule. With Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building Chinese- style socialism as the guide, we should 
conscientiously implement the spirit of the 14th party congress 
and the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee, 
unswervingly adhere to the party's basic line, firmly stick to 
the central task of economic construction, and continue the 
policy of deepened reform and opening up. We should do two 
types of work simultaneously and attach equal importance to 
both; carry forward the fine tradition of self- reliance, hard 
struggle, and building the country thriftily; properly handle 
the relations between reform, development and stability; arouse 
the enthusiasm of all fields in speeding up the establishment of 
a socialist market economic system; open up wider to the outside 
world; readjust the economic structure and increase efficiency; 
maintain sustained, rapid, and healthy [shi xu kuai su jian kang 
fa zhan 2170 4958 1816 6643 0256 1660 4099 1455] economic 
growth; promote comprehensive social progress; and safeguard and 
develop the political situation of stability and unity. 
  The country's economy is at the stage of high growth. The 
state has placed the development of the central and western 
regions and the exploitation of the western resources on the 
agenda. Thanks to the favorable trend of Sichuan's economy, a 
number of large foreign firms are optimistic about the Sichuan 
market. In the face of such a golden opportunity, we must seize 
the opportunity to expedite development. Firmly bearing in mind 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's teaching that "development is the last 
word" and upholding the criteria of "three advantages," we 
should further emancipate our minds, seek truth from facts, make 
bold explorations, and forge ahead with a high sense of 
historical responsibility and mission. We should continue to 
follow the development strategy of "relying on science and 
technology, structural readjustment, combining the Army with the 
people, urban-rural integration, having a foothold in the basin, 
and developing the two flanks" and the regional development plan 
of "relying on the two cities, grasping the two lines, 
developing the two flanks, and bringing along development of the 
whole province." 
  In light of these guidelines, the main targets of Sichuan's 
1994 economic development will be set initially at: GNP--220.8 
billion yuan, up 9.6 percent; total industrial and agricultural 
output value--376.8 billion yuan (calculated in terms of 1990 
constant prices), up 12.8 percent from 1993; of this amount, 
agriculture-- 84.3 billion yuan, up 4 percent; industry--292.5 
billion yuan, up 15.6 percent; and local revenue--12.24 billion 
yuan, up 9.7 percent. 
  The task to attain the 1994 targets is extremely arduous, 
requiring the concerted efforts of the people of the whole 
province and the focusing of attention on doing well work in the 
following 10 fields: 
  1. Promote the overall situation, make breakthroughs 
in special points, and adopt supporting measures to accelerate 
the pace of reform 
  Centered on establishing a modern enterprise system, 
nurturing and setting up a market system, and accelerating the 
pace of comprehensive county-level economic structural reform, 
we should promote reform of the taxation, banking, investment, 
planning, foreign trade, social insurance, housing, and 
scientific and technological systems; gradually introduce 
structural reform of local organs; and lay a sound foundation 
for establishing a socialist market economy system in Sichuan. 
  With the central task of running large and medium-sizes 
state 
enterprises well and with the objective of establishing a modern 
enterprise system, it is necessary to accelerate enterprise 
reform and structural readjustment. We should continue to 
implement the "Enterprise Law," the "Regulations for Enterprises 
To Effect a Change in Their Operation Mechanism," and the 
"Regulations for Exercising Supervision and Management Over 
State Enterprise Property"; carry out well the modern enterprise 
system experiment in four enterprises selected by the state and 
22 enterprises chosen by the province (all localities also may 
select a small number of enterprises to undergo the experiment); 
continue the experiment of 2,000 state enterprises changing 
their operation mechanisms; and ensure a smooth transition from 
the contract system to the practice of a unified income tax. We 
should speed up reform of the enterprise property rights system, 
strengthen and improve the operation and management of state 
assets, clearly define property rights relations, and gradually 
explore the establishment of a modern enterprise system based on 
the enterprise corporation property system, so that enterprises 
will undertake the responsibility for f preserving and 
increasing the value of state assets. It is necessary to push 
forward the transformation, transfer of production, leasing, and 
selling of small and medium- sized state enterprises. In light 
of the standard requirements, we should introduce various forms 
of shareholding experiments, select for the formation of large 
public utility groups those energy and communications projects 
and key enterprises that have conditions enabling them to have 
an impact on Sichuan's economic construction, advocate and 
encourage enterprises under different forms of ownership to 
become shareholding companies, vigorously develop corporate 
limited companies and shareholding limited companies, and 
steadily develop directional collection companies where workers 
are shareholders. Focusing on the development of key 
industries, the formation of key enterprises, and the 
development of essential products, it is necessary, through 
market guidance and government promotion to encourage enterprise 
reorganization by means of mergers, the shareholding system, 
enterprise groups, and joint ventures with foreign firms. 
  While upholding the principle of common development of 
various economic sectors, based on the predominance of the 
public sector, we must vigorously readjust the ownership 
structure, and promote both the state and collective economies. 
It is necessary to encourage the economic development of the 
individual, private, and exclusively foreign-funded sectors, and 
to increase the proportion of the nonstate and nonpublic sectors 
in Sichuan's economic setup. We should transform the system of 
the small and medium-sized state enterprises, sell them, or let 
them be run by the people under state ownership, and gradually 
reorganize urban and rural collective enterprises into 
shareholding enterprises or exercise private operation under 
public ownership. It is necessary to create conditions for 
various economic sectors to participate in market competition on 
an equal footing and to treat all kinds of enterprises equally 
and without discrimination. 
  The county-level comprehensive economic structural reform 
must be strengthened, and the county-level economic development 
must be accelerated. In light of the requirements for 
establishing a socialist market economy system and in light of 
the outstanding problems that have cropped up in county economic 
development and that demand prompt solutions, it is necessary to 
nurture various forms of market systems that are composed of 
diverse sectors, to introduce the experiments of township 
enterprise shareholding and the shareholding cooperative system, 
to straighten out enterprise property rights relations, to 
practice various forms of asset-operation forms, and to 
comprehensively invigorate the enterprise operational mechanism. 
To resolve the difficulties in selling farm produce and the 
peasants' difficulties in buying materials, it is necessary to 
establish a spot wholesale market for farm produce and a 
wholesale market for manufactured goods. We should break with 
the demarcation line between administrative regions, trades, and 
ownership, and should vigorously develop trade- 
industry-agriculture integration, as well as production- 
transportation-marketing economic organizations. 
  The reform of the banking system must be deepened. In 
compliance with the diverse trend of banking organizations, 
channels, and services, we should adopt more flexible measures, 
develop local banking organizations, and support the branch 
offices set up in Sichuan by the national banking organizations 
and financial organizations of other provinces and regions. We 
should set up an exchange center for treasury bonds. Conditions 
should be laid down for the newly established State Agricultural 
Development Bank and the Import and Export Credit Bank to set up 
representative offices or branches in Sichuan as early as 
possible. Based on the existing urban and rural credit 
cooperatives, we should establish on a trial basis an urban 
cooperative bank and a rural cooperative bank. It is necessary 
to develop the range of operation and business means of the 
insurance and trust investment companies, and to enhance the 
existing nonbanking financial organizations. We should 
vigorously import foreign capital and create conditions for one 
or two foreign banks to set up branches in Sichuan. 
  We should deepen reform of the taxation system and ensure 
that the revenue-sharing system will be implemented smoothly in 
Sichuan. It is necessary to stabilize the financial system 
between the province and all localities, step up the building of 
state and local taxation organs, enhance management over 
taxation and finance, and strengthen the province's macrocontrol 
and regulation over finance. To increase revenue, it is 
necessary to vigorously open new financial resources. We should 
earnestly study and enforce the Taxation Law and improve the 
methods for levying taxes. In accordance with the Rules for 
Financial Affairs and the Rules for Accounting, the distribution 
of interests between the government and enterprises should be 
standardized. We also should vigorously raise funds and support 
economic development. 
  Reform of the investment system: Construction projects will 
be divided into competitive investment, infrastructure 
investment, and public utility investment projects. It is 
necessary to strengthen market regulation of the capital 
accommodation and investment of the competitive projects, expand 
the channels for capital accommodation and investment of the 
basic projects, and improve the system of capital accommodation 
and investment of the public utility projects. We should 
establish an investment risk-binding mechanism; affirm the main 
investment status of enterprises; put the legal person first, 
then determine the project; replace the system of examination 
and approval with the system of application and record; and 
extend the investment decision-making right of enterprises. It 
is necessary to reform the management method for investment 
plans, and no longer merely rely on the overall planned targets 
to control the total investment, but start from the sources of 
capital instead, mainly apply economic means, and exercise 
indirect control over the formation and use of investment 
capital. 
  Reform of the planning system: To transform the functions of 
planned management, the fundamental point is to transform the 
traditional mandatory planning system and to establish a 
guidance planning system that meets the needs of a socialist 
market economy, is advantageous to comprehensive control over 
major issues, and is also favorable to flexibility in minor 
affairs. The method of planned management should be changed 
from direct to indirect regulation and control and to applying 
economic policies, regulations, and levers to regulate economic 
operation. We should establish a scientific planning system and 
a national economic accounting system, and should improve the 
alarm system for exercising macroeconomic supervision. With the 
stress gradually put on medium- and long-term planning, the 
system of annual planning should be reformed. Attention should 
be given to the formulation and implementation of industrial 
policies, the regulations of a trade or profession, and special 
planning. 
  Reform of the circulation system: In light of the principle 
of "he who makes investment owns and benefits," it is necessary 
to make full use of the advantages of communications, to develop 
the market, and to promote commerce. We should focus attention 
on building a number of large-scale functional and influential 
markets for means of production, and for farm and sideline 
produce, and to build a wholesale market; vigorously nurture and 
develop markets for finance, science and technology, qualified 
personnel, labor, information, real estate, and other essential 
factors; and promote the rational flow of essential factors for 
production. Efforts should be made to vigorously and steadily 
develop a commodity exchange; organize and build several futures 
markets; nurture the rural market; and gradually establish a 
unified, open, standard, competitive, and controllable market 
system that is suited to economic growth and the people's living 
standards. The barriers between regions and markets, between 
urban and rural areas, and between trades should be removed, and 
reform of the supply and market cooperatives, state commerce, 
and material supply enterprise system should be promoted. 
Practicing the competition and elimination mechanism, the small 
retail shops and material supply enterprises can be sold by 
means of auctions. Based on handling enterprise credit and 
liabilities well and on resettling staff, the funds should be 
withdrawn and put into large-scale market-building in the form 
of holdings. 
  The building of the social insurance system should be 
focused on improving the retirement, medical, and unemployment 
insurance systems. Where conditions permit, the retirement 
system also may be tried out in rural areas. It is necessary to 
comprehensively introduce reform of the housing system, to put 
the funds for housing reform into building residential houses, 
and to implement the "Housing Project." 
  On the premise of the state rationally dividing the economic 
management powers of the central and localities, the provincial- 
level economic regulation-and-control and management mechanism 
should be improved. Through legislation, policies, planning, 
budget, and local taxation, the province's economic activities 
should be readjusted to maintain the basic balance of the 
economy and to bring about optimization of the economic set-up. 
<H5>  2. Open up wider and in all directions </H5>
  Opening up wider constitutes a major measure for deepened 
reform, economic development, and social progress. The 
government, as well as departments at all levels and the people 
throughout the province, should further emancipate their minds; 
fully understand the special importance of the measures adopted 
by Sichuan to give prominence to opening up, to strengthen 
foreign economic, trade, and external affairs, enhance external 
cooperation, and import foreign capital; get rid of the 
seclusion mentality and increase a sense of opening up; improve 
the software investment environment and simplify procedures for 
handling affairs; and improve the quality of services. We 
should make the most of the preferential policies enjoyed by 
Chengdu and Chongqing, and should strive to turn a number of 
cities with appropriate conditions along Chang Jiang or along 
the railways into inland open cities. The four state-level 
development zones and province-designated development zones must 
be run well, and we should build a number of state-endorsed 
development zones. To implement the "economy and trade" 
development strategy, it is necessary to further expand the 
sphere of cooperation with other countries. 
  We should vigorously develop foreign trade and exports, and 
should expand the scale of foreign exchange earning. The role 
of vital force of various types of foreign trade companies 
throughout the province should be brought into full play. While 
consolidating and developing the existing market, we should step 
up the opening of the East European, South American, African, 
CIS, and Southeast Asian markets; expand export channels; and 
introduce more Sichuan products to the international market. 
The foreign trade enterprise operation structural reform should 
be deepened and an operational mechanism should be established 
which is suited to international economic operation rules and 
unified policies, fair competition, independent operation, and 
sole assumption of responsibility for profits and losses. To 
increase foreign exchange from exports, the state foreign trade 
enterprises should be reorganized in light of the requirements 
of the modern enterprise system. Plans should be worked out to 
set up 10 large international export consortia. We encourage 
enterprises with appropriate conditions to increase their 
foreign exchange earning through exports. The powers of import 
and export operation should be delegated and 
province-prefecture-county trade entities should be established 
to carry out various forms of foreign trade businesses through 
various channels and levels. The strategic position of 
developing export commodities should be determined, and a number 
of unique and prospective enterprises with sound financial 
strength should be selected to serve as the commodity production 
bases and upgrade Sichuan's export commodities. It is 
particularly necessary to expedite the development of value- 
added, technical-intensive electromechanical equipment and other 
high-tech products. Meanwhile, it is necessary to pay attention 
to the precision processing of silk fabrics, leather goods, 
garments, meat, food, and medicines; improve their quality; and 
develop a series of leading products with Sichuan 
characteristics. We should develop transnational operation, 
support the companies abroad, increase their role as windows and 
bridges, and strive to attain an export volume of $2 billion. 
  We should expand the sphere of inviting and importing 
foreign 
investment, and should make the most of foreign capital. 
Efforts should be made to run well the existing three types of 
foreign- funded enterprises and to newly set up another 2,000 
foreign-funded enterprises through expanding the channels for 
attracting foreign investment. It is particularly necessary to 
attract well-known transnational companies, large consortia, and 
first-rate scientific and technological enterprises to Sichuan 
to develop cooperation. With a foothold on Sichuan's advantages 
in resources, infrastructural building, readjustment of 
industries and products, and technical transformation of old 
enterprises, various forms should be adopted to import foreign 
capital, technology, equipment, and managerial experience. A 
number of backbone enterprises and large and medium-sized 
enterprises or workshops should be offered to attract technical- 
and value-added projects through joint venture, cooperation, 
leasing, transfer, and other means, and to develop a number of 
large-scale foreign-funded enterprises. While ensuring that $1 
billion will be attracted, we should strive for a higher figure 
of $1.5 billion. 
  We should develop foreign economic, technological, and labor 
cooperation; make use of various channels to strive for all 
kinds of bidding abroad; and particularly take note of promoting 
labor cooperation and transactions in contracting engineering 
projects with the export of full sets of equipment. Meanwhile, 
it is necessary to develop non-commodity trade, which includes 
international tourism. 
  We should strengthen foreign affairs and foreign propaganda 
work; further expand international friendly contacts, as well as 
economic, scientific and technological, and cultural exchanges; 
and increase mutual understanding and cooperation. A good job 
should be done in work concerning nationals residing abroad and 
in Taiwan, Hong Kong, and Macao affairs. The customs, 
commercial inspection, and border inspection departments should 
deepen reform, strengthen management, and perform service work 
well. 
  We should enhance lateral ties and develop economic and 
technological cooperation with neighboring provinces and cities, 
particularly the provinces and cities along the Chang Jiang, the 
coast, and the border. Policies and measures similar to those 
for foreign investors will apply to investment from other 
provinces, and further preferential policies will be offered to 
those investing in the Three Gorges Project. We should 
strengthen management over Sichuan's "window" enterprises abroad 
and in other provinces. 
<H5>  3. Enhance the foundation of agriculture and accelerate </H5>
rural economic development 
  The questions of agriculture, rural areas, and the peasants 
have always been a fundamental issue related to the overall 
situation of our party and state. The more we speed up reform 
and opening up, the more attention and protection should be 
given to agriculture. As a big agricultural province, Sichuan's 
task of developing agriculture, particularly increasing 
peasants' incomes, is extraordinarily arduous. Governments at 
all levels should earnestly implement the spirit of the central 
rural work conference; comprehensively implement the 
"Agricultural Law" and the "Law on Popularizing Agrotechniques"; 
firmly bear in the mind that agriculture is the foundation; 
regard agriculture as the foundation of economic work at all 
times; earnestly strengthen leadership over agriculture and 
rural work; further stabilize and improve rural policies; deepen 
rural reform; perform the functions of guidance, support, 
protection, regulation, and control; and promote comprehensive 
rural economic development. 
  The current deepened rural reform should be focused on 
nurturing the market, perfecting the market system, 
strengthening macroeconomic regulation and control, protecting 
agriculture, and speeding up the establishment of a rural 
economic operational mechanism and management system that meet 
the needs of a socialist market economy. It is necessary to 
continuously stabilize and improve the system of contracted 
responsibility with payment linked to output and the management 
system in which unified management is combined with separate 
management. We should stabilize property rights relations, 
resolve the problem of compensated transfer of land use, and 
improve and strengthen the functions of production services, 
coordinated management, and capital accumulation of the social 
cooperative economic organizations. The shareholding 
cooperative system should be applied to run all types of 
economic entities and should accelerate the growth of the 
village collective economy. 
  Centered on the objective of "stabilizing grain production, 
increasing output, and attaining the comparatively well-off 
level," this year's task should be focused on "stabilizing grain 
production, increasing output, and readjusting the setup"; 
combating natural disasters; and reaping bumper harvests. As 
grain is the foundation for Sichuan's stability and development, 
we should ensure an average of 400 kg per capita possession of 
grain. On the premise of stabilizing grain production and 
speeding up structural readjustment, we should try by every 
means to increase the peasants' per capita income by 80 yuan and 
try to raise the figure to 100 yuan. With the market as the 
guide and with the backing of science and technology, we should 
further readjust the agricultural structure, optimize the 
distribution of resources, and develop high- yield, 
fine-quality, and efficient agriculture. With increasing the 
peasants' income as the objective, it is necessary to open up 
new sources for production and to go all-out to develop 
value-added industries and products with a high commodity rate 
and capacity to earn foreign exchange. throughout the rural 
economy, it is necessary to vigorously develop the secondary and 
tertiary industries on the basis of stabilizing agriculture, and 
to increase their proportion in total rural production. In 
overall agriculture, we should take note of using uncultivated 
land, of comprehensively developing agricultural resources, and 
of diverse operations. We should give prominence to animal 
husbandry and to fruit and aquatic farming, and should increase 
their proportion in total rural production. In farming, it is 
necessary to develop cash crops and fodder on the premise of 
stabilizing grain production. 
  Investment in agriculture should be increased through 
various 
channels. An agricultural input system thth combines the state 
with the collective and with individual peasants should be 
established to ensure a gradual increase in agricultural input. 
The increase in agricultural input by financial departments at 
all levels should be higher than that in revenue. The province 
has allocated 40 million yuan this year to support agriculture. 
The increase in loans granted to agriculture by the 
Agricultural Bank should be higher than the average increase in 
loans granted to other fields. On the premise of independent 
operation, more loans for more deposits, and ensuring the needs 
of credit for production, the rural credit cooperatives should 
expand the fields for capital investment. We should continue to 
consolidate, improve, develop, and expand the rural cooperative 
fund; guide the peasants to increase their capital and labor 
accumulation; strengthen management over agricultural funds and 
the funds for special purposes; and ensure the allocation of 
agricultural funds. We should properly use the funds for farm 
purposes and should increase the efficiency of investment in 
agriculture. 
  We should rely on science and technology to boost 
agriculture. Effective measures should be adopted to carry out 
farming, breeding, and introducing fine breeds. We should 
extensively popularize new farm and animal products and 
techniques, and extend advanced and applicable techniques in 
suitable areas. Rural science and education should be upgraded 
to a new level. The "Spark Plan" and the "Harvest Plan" should 
continue to be developed in the high-tech and 
technology-intensive areas. Attention should be given to the 
comprehensive rural technological development experiment 
conducted in counties and townships. 
  We should strengthen agricultural production, 
transportation, storage, and other infrastructural building, and 
should increase the comprehensive production capacity of 
agriculture. Efforts should be made to build irrigation works 
and carry out farmland capital construction, promote 
agricultural mechanization, and continuously improve the 
conditions for agricultural production. While paying attention 
to the maintenance and overhaul of existing water works and 
electrical irrigation facilities, it is necessary to concentrate 
forces to build well the Wudu, Shengzhong, and Daqiao 
reservoirs; the 16 medium-sized reservoirs; and a number of 
major water works. We should continue to transform the 
low-yield land in central and east Sichuan, maintain water and 
soil conservation in the upper reaches of Chang Jiang, build the 
shelter forest in the middle and upper reaches of the Chang 
Jiang, and carry out the key projects to provide work and grain 
as a form of relief. During the year, Sichuan will transform 2 
million mu of medium- and low-yield land, resolve the problem of 
water shortages for 200,000 people and 250,000 head of animals, 
and afforest 4.64 million mu of land. 
  Agricultural protection should be enhanced. In light of the 
state's grain policy of "ensuring quantity and lifting price 
restrictions," we should work out and adopt protective measures 
for agriculture, improve the grain production-purchase-marketing 
system, establish a scientific and rational price system for 
grain which helps arouse the enthusiasm of various sectors, duly 
increase the protection price of grain, set up a grain risk 
fund, and improve the grain reserve system. Continued efforts 
should be made to alleviate the unreasonable burdens on 
peasants, and no IOUs should be issued when purchasing farm 
produce. We should implement the "Land Management Law," 
earnestly protect cultivated land, exercise strict control over 
land for nonfarming purposes, establish a farmland protection 
system, and adopt effective land reclamation and compensation 
methods. Agricultural insurance should be introduced gradually 
and the agricultural risk compensation mechanism should be 
improved. We should effectively organize production, storage, 
and supply of the means of production; strengthen management 
over the market for farm materials; and ensure agricultural 
needs. 
  We should seize the opportunity to accelerate the 
development 
of township enterprises, which constitute the essential mainstay 
of the rural economy and the hope for Sichuan's peasants to take 
the road to prosperity. The areas that have started late should 
put accelerated growth in the first place. Areas that already 
have a sound foundation should tap potentials, improve their 
operational mechanism, speed up their technical transformation, 
make efforts to readjust the structure and expand their scale of 
operations, and strive to occupy a position in the market both 
inside and outside the province. The areas that have developed 
rapidly should combine themselves with the building of small 
towns, bring about the growth of the tertiary industry, expedite 
the transfer of surplus rural labor, and promote the process of 
agricultural modernization. Township enterprises may become 
shareholders in, cooperate with, and lease or buy state 
enterprises. It is necessary to consolidate and develop the 
comparatively well-off demonstration villages. We should try by 
every means to ensure that the total output value of Sichuan's 
township enterprises will reach 250 billion yuan, and that their 
sales, profits, and taxes will increase simultaneously. 
  The agricultural socialized service system must be improved. 
It is necessary to strengthen the building of the township and 
village agrotechnique popularization service organizations, and 
to determine the size of their establishment. The 
agrotechnique, forestry, animal husbandry, veterinary, water 
conservancy, farm machinery, meteorology, and other service 
organizations should be run well. We should combine technical 
services with material supply, and should offer services for the 
entire process of production. In addition to encouraging 
peasants to set up associations, special cooperatives, and other 
self service organizations, we should guide and assist peasants 
in entering the circulation field. 
<H5>  4. Strengthen infrastructure building and readjust the </H5>
industrial structure 
  To maintain a rational scale of investment, it is necessary 
to readjust the investment set-up and increase efficiency. 
Fixed-asset investment should be within the framework of 58.8 
billion yuan. To improve the investment environment and speed 
up economic growth, we should concentrate forces on expediting 
the construction of transportation, communications, energy, and 
other basic facilities. 
  With the railways and highways as the key point, we should 
enormously develop aviation, step up the building of ports along 
the Chang Jiang, and gradually establish a rationally 
distributed and comprehensive transportation network. With the 
stress on opening up a channel from Sichuan to other provinces, 
we should step up the double tracking of the southern section of 
the Baoji-Chengdu railway and the electrification of the 
Chengdu-Kunming railway and the Yuda section of the 
Xiangfan-Chongqing railway, accelerate the construction of the 
Dacheng railway and the railway project in the western suburbs 
of Chengdu, resume construction of the Anbian-Shushe section of 
the Neikung railway, and make preparations for the Dawang 
railway. Attention should be paid to the transformation and 
construction of the Cheng-Xian, Chongqing-Guiyang, 
Zigong-Kunming, and other trunk lines. The building of the 
Chengdu-Chongqing, Mianle, and Neiyi expressways should be 
accelerated. We also should speed up construction of the second 
Chang Jiang bridge in Chongqing and of the Chang Jiang bridges 
in Wanxian and Buling. In addition to dredging the inland 
rivers, it is necessary to expand the main ports along the Chang 
Jiang and to upgrade the technical level of ships. We should 
develop aviation, expand the Shuangliu International Airport in 
Chengdu, and build medium-sized airports in key cities. We 
should launch the third stage of the digital communications 
project, continue to develop optical fiber lines, increase the 
number of digital telephones, set up the Sichuan mobile 
communications network and paging network as early as possible, 
improve Sichuan's long-distance exchange network, and increase 
the capacity of the satellite ground receiving stations in 
Chengdu and Chongqing. 
  Energy resources should be exploited on a large scale. The 
pace of building the Ertan, Baozhuzhi, and other large power 
projects should be accelerated and we should strive for the 
construction of the Guangan power plant and the 
Nanyaezhile-Yaohe dam power station, and for the technical 
transformation of the Chengdu thermal power plant, the planning 
of the Zipingpu reservoir and Pubugou power station, the 
exploitation of the valleys, and the acceleration of power 
construction in the localities. Attention should be paid to the 
technical transformation of coal mines. We should tap 
potentials and effectively carry out the coal-power operation of 
the Junlian coal mine and the preparatory work for the Guxu 
mine. We should enhance the exploitation and production 
capacity of gas fields, and ensure steady growth in the gas 
industry. 
  Mineral resources should be exploited and the raw materials 
industry developed. We should make the most of the Panxi 
mineral resources, comprehensively utilize titanium coulsonite, 
and study and develop new materials. We should step up 
construction of the second stage of the Pangang steel works and 
make preparations for planning the second base of the Sichuan 
iron and steel plant. Sichuan should develop the chemical 
industry, step up construction of the Zigong polyester project, 
exploit stone resources, and do precision processing well. 
  To push forward urban infrastructural building, a good job 
must be done in urban planning. The stress should be placed on 
building urban facilities in Chengdu and Chongqing and in the 
functional and satellite cities, as well as on creating 
conditions for turning them into international metropolises. We 
should gradually develop a number of new large and medium-sized 
cities and distinctive regional economic centers with the 
backing of these cities. The pace of building small towns 
should be accelerated, and special attention should be given to 
the planning and construction of 100 small towns that will serve 
as links between the urban and rural economies, and gradually 
will narrow the gap between cities and the countryside. 
  Sichuan should readjust the industrial setup, develop its 
pillar industries, and increase investment in technical 
transformation and technological progress. Great efforts should 
be made to transform old enterprises and traditional industries. 
A plan should be worked out to develop Sichuan's pillar 
industries and leading products. In light of the principle of a 
high starting point, specialized division of labor, mass 
production, and making breakthroughs one by one, we should 
concentrate financial, material, and human resources to run the 
following well: the automobile, motorcycle, electronics, 
electromechanical equipment, crane, building machinery, 
metallurgy, building materials, chemical, food, pharmacy, and 
other pillar industries, and to develop economies of scale. 
Attention should be paid to applicability, creativity, and 
progress in the development of new products. We should focus 
attention on the technical transformation of 100 major 
enterprises, eight trades, and 50 leading products, and should 
ensure the development of 2,000 new products and the upgrading 
of 10 major products. All enterprises should cater to the 
market, carry out technical innovation, update their equipment, 
and use new materials. We should strengthen comprehensive 
quality control, enhance the state's sample quality inspection, 
and strive to attain a quality rate of over 92 percent. 
  Special efforts should be made to turn deficits into profits 
and to increase industrial economic efficiency. We should 
enhance basic management over enterprise technology, equipment, 
and costs, and should regard energy consumption, cost reduction, 
turning deficits into profits, and increasing efficiency as the 
main criteria for evaluating enterprise operators. 
  Sichuan should make the most of the ordnance industry and 
speed up the development of civilian products. We should make 
full use of ordnance technology to accelerate the pace of 
developing civilian products and should make proper use of the 
assets of ordnance enterprises. In addition to consolidating 
the existing automobile, motorcycle, chemical, machinery, 
electronics, and other competitive industries, it is necessary 
to develop a number of leading products on the premise of 
ensuring Army supplies; to complete a number of major technical 
transformation projects; and to build a number of production 
bases for quality and brandname products. 

<H5>    5. Developing tertiary industries and doing a good job </H5>
in financial, taxation, and monetary sectors 
  Vigorous efforts should be taken to develop tertiary 
industries. Both state-owned and cooperative enterprises should 
take the road of intensive management by grouping enterprises, 
as well as the road of modernization in line with the concept of 
generalized commerce, general market, and general circulation; 
give full play to their overall superiorities in personnel, 
technology, and equipment; and actively carry out step-by-step 
experiments with the joint-stock system. Qualified enterprises 
may organize and develop enterprise groups in such forms as 
merger and mutual share-holding. It is imperative to encourage 
the introduction and utilization of foreign funds to renovate 
commercial facilities and equipment. Supply and marketing 
cooperatives should practice comprehensive management, improve 
their service facilities and means, strengthen technological 
service functions, and set up a relatively stable service and 
management system that integrates agriculture, industry, and 
commerce. A good job needs to be done in the building of 
service networks, as well as commercial networks in small towns 
and townships. Productive enterprises need to be encouraged to 
shift their surplus means of production toward tertiary 
industries. Efforts should be taken to develop chartered 
accounting and auditing firms. Overall planning should be made 
and comprehensive measures taken to make full use of tourist 
resources, to increase input into tourism, to promote tourist 
and scenic spots, to improve the quality of tourist services, to 
make a success of the 1994 Tours of Cultural Relic and Historic 
Sites, to boost the development of the tourist and related 
industries, and to create conditions to build Leshan and 
Dujianyan into national-level tourist and holiday resorts. 
  We should do a good job in financial accommodation and in 
the 
collection of funds through various financing channels and 
means. Efforts should be made to further standardize and develop 
the loans and securities markets, increase the varieties of 
bonds, and do a good job in the issuance and transfer of various 
stocks and bonds. More flexible forms should be adopted to 
increase savings deposits in urban and rural areas. We should 
persistently take the development of pillar industries, 
competitive products, and foreign exchange-earning products as 
the guiding factor in economic development; rationalize the 
distribution of credit funds according to the principle of 
supporting the superior and limiting the inferior; bring about 
the best possible coordination between banks and enterprises in 
the use of funds through readjustments of reserves and 
increments of funds; and bring about an efficient readjustment 
in both the industrial structure and the product mix. We need to 
grant more agricultural loans to guarantee purchases of 
agricultural products. We should support industrial and 
commercial enterprises in their efforts to increase effective 
supply and expand the market. Strides should be taken to 
support major constructions and key projects of technological 
renovation, to enhance the domestic adaptive capacity for funds 
of foreign-invested enterprises, and to boost the production of 
major export products. The management structures of foreign 
exchange and foreign bonds need to be reformed, and vigorous 
efforts should be made to develop the insurance industry. It is 
necessary to continue implementing the rural credit policy, 
which features "more credits for more deposits," with a view to 
enlivening the financial sector in rural areas. Rural 
cooperative funds should be consolidated and developed so that 
we can exercise sound management over and make flexible use of 
various funds. 
  It is important to increase market supply and tighten 
control 
over commodity prices. A good job needs to be done in 
production and transportation, as well as in ensuring market 
supplies of people's daily necessities, including grain, cooking 
oil, meat, vegetables, and industrial items for daily use. 
Efforts should be made to intensify market management, and 
technological and commodity-price supervision. We should deal 
severe blows at the manufacture and sale of counterfeit and 
inferior-quality products, and should protect consumers' 
legitimate rights and interests. Efforts should be made to 
implement and digest the price reform according to the 
arrangements of the state. We should pay special attention to 
the supervision and control of the market; set up an alarm 
system for price increases; establish reserve systems for major 
commodities such as grain, pork, chemical fertilizer, gasoline, 
and essential building materials; and perfect the collection and 
utilization of price regulation funds. Vigorous efforts should 
be made to bring price increases under control and to keep the 
growth rate at around 10 percent. We must attach importance to 
the life of the masses -- especially the life of those in 
disaster-stricken areas, where food and clothing are 
insufficient -- to the life of workers and staff in enterprises 
that have totally or partially suspended production, and to the 
life of low-income families. 
  We should do a good job in financial and taxation work, and 
should help localities increase financial revenue. Since the 
system of tax division was put into practice, localities have 
relied mainly on enterprises' income tax and sales tax for their 
financial revenue. Therefore, more attention should be paid to 
the profit- making capability of enterprises. Continued strides 
should be taken to rectify the "three disorders," to lighten 
enterprises' financial burdens, and to help them prevent profit 
losses. Efforts should be made to intensify the functions of 
financial departments, and to make good use of the tools of 
finance and credit. New financial sources need to be opened up 
through vigorous efforts. It is imperative to strengthen tax 
collection and tax management so that all financial revenues can 
be put into the treasury promptly. Reform of state-owned 
enterprises' profit-distribution system should be implemented 
successfully, and new applicable tax rates should be implemented 
strictly. We should exercise control over financial 
expenditures and group consumption, and shold ensure the payment 
of salaries to cadres, workers, and staff members, and 
especially to teachers. We also should impose sound management 
over and make flexible use of extra-budgetary funds. 
  Sichuan Province is vast in territory, and there exist 
considerable gaps between different regions. Under such 
circumstances, we need to provide different guidance to 
different types of areas, and help them achieve progress at 
different levels. Efforts should be made to perfect the economic 
development program, development policies, and work arrangements 
for the Three Gorges Economic Zone, the Comprehensive Resources 
Development Zone to the west of Panzhihua in southern Sichuan, 
the Northern Sichuan Economic Zone, as well as regions inhabited 
by minority nationalities. 
  With the aim of building Chengdu and Chongqing into modern 
international metropolises, we will reinforce the economic 
strength of these two cities, give better play to their 
functions in bringing along other cities, make full use of the 
preferential open policies they already enjoy, continuously 
accelerate the development of the "one-line" area from Youjiang 
to the Emei Shan, push forward the development and opening up of 
the "one-line" area between Chengdu and Chongqing, and link 
advanced areas with backward ones so that all can head for 
common prosperity. 
  Basing on the city of Chengdu, we will develop mainly such 
pillar industries as electronics, automobiles, and heavy 
machinery; bring about rapid development in the Northern Sichuan 
Economic Zone; and gradually turn Chengdu into a technological 
center, commercial and trade center, financial center, 
communications and transport hub, and a stable production base 
for agricultural and sideline products of the southwestern 
region. 
  Based on the city of Chongqing, we will focus mainly on the 
development of such pillar industries as automobiles, 
motorcycles, machinery, metallurgy, industrial chemicals, and 
building materials; seize the opportunities provided by the 
development and opening up of the Chang Jiang, as well as by the 
Three Gorges Project, which has entered the phase of substantive 
preparation; accelerate the development of the Three Gorges 
Economic Zone; and gradually turn Chongqing into an economic 
center, scientific and technological center, communications hub, 
and an automobile, motorcycle, and energy production base of the 
southwestern region. Efforts should be made to implement the 
resettlement principle marked by development and opening up, 
closely integrate the resettlement of residents with the 
economic development of areas around the reservoir, increase 
input into the resettlement work, and expedite the pace of 
resettlement. We also will make full use of policies granted to 
open cities along the Chang Jiang, including Wanxian and Fuling, 
and will accelerate the pace in constructing ports and support 
facilities, as well as the salification and chlorine- alkaline 
projects in eastern Sichuan. 
  Taking energy, chemicals, metallurgy and other pillar 
industries as a leading factor, the province will vigorously 
improve its communications and transport facilities, strive to 
obtain more open and more flexible policies, introduce funds and 
technology from abroad, pay close attention to the construction 
and preparation of a number of major projects, speed up the 
comprehensive development of natural resources, and bring about 
the development of the economic zone to the west of Panzhihua, 
in southern Sichuan. 
  Areas inhabited by minority nationalities should vigorously 
develop the tobacco and mining industries, forestry, fruit 
production, animal husbandry, and the production of traditional 
Chinese medicine; should set up a number of bases for the 
production of minerals, forests and fruit, animal husbandry, and 
traditional Chinese medicine; develop and utilize hydroelectric 
resources and key tourist resources; give shape to new economic 
growth points; and speed up the pace of economic development. 
  It is imperative to accelerate the economic development of 
old revolutionary bases and the Panzhou Shan area. Efforts will 
be taken to further relax policies; increase scientific and 
capital input into these areas; and expedite the development of 
transport, telecommunications, energy construction, and resource 
exploration. Town and township enterprises, as well as the 
individual and privately owned economies, will undergo 
considerable development. 
<H5>  7. Pay close attention to science and technology, as well as </H5>
education, and bring about development of all social undertakings 
  Continued efforts will be made to carry out the strategy of 
rejuvenating Sichuan through the application of science and 
technology; to further implement the policy on intellectuals; to 
closely integrate science and technology with education and 
economic development; to give vigorous play to the roles of 
science, technology, and education in guiding and pushing 
forward both economic and social development. 
  It is necessary to uphold the concept that science and 
technology are the primary productive forces, and to arm all 
trades and industries with modern science and technology. The 
"Law on Scientific and Technological Progress" should be put 
into effect so as to perfect the system of policies, rules, and 
regulations on science and technology. Strides will be taken to 
put into comprehensive practice Sichuan's plan for accelerating 
reform of the scientific and technological system, and to bring 
about well- coordinated development in the economic, social, and 
scientific and technological fields. Special attention will be 
paid to the 180 key technical projects and experimental 
industrial projects assigned by the state, as well as to 60 
projects for the commercialization of major scientific and 
technological results. It is imperative to bring up a number of 
leading scholars in different academic subjects who can continue 
to render services in the next century; vigorously introduce, 
digest, and transplant advanced science and technology from 
foreign countries; accelerate the development of new and high 
technologies, as well as related industries; and do a better job 
in running new- and high-tech industrial development zones. 
Efforts will be made to accelerate the commercialization of 
scientific and technological results, to boost scientific and 
technological progress, to develop scientific and technological 
industries, and to enhance the proportion of scientific and 
technological progress in the national economic growth. 
Continued efforts will be made to increase input into 
scientific and technological work. By placing the focus of our 
attention on deepening reform as well as on the building of the 
two civilizations, we will vigorously carry out social and 
scientific research, and especially research into policy-making 
sciences. Scientific and technological personnel who have made 
outstanding contributions should be awarded, and intellectuals 
should be encouraged to enter the major battlefield of economic 
development. It is necessary to run well the provincial 
conference on scientific and technological work, and to set off 
a new upsurge of people throughout the country learning, loving, 
and using science. Efforts should be taken to reinforce the 
protection of intellectual property rights. 
  Conscientious work should be done to carry out the "Outline 
on Education Reform and Development," as well as the "Teachers' 
Law"; to place education in a strategic position and give 
priority to educational development in real terms; and to strive 
to enhance the ideological, moral, scientific, and cultural 
levels of the entire nation. We should carry out the party's 
education principle in a comprehensive way, uphold the socialist 
orientation of education, enhance the quality of education, and 
put in a great deal of work into bringing up useful, talented 
people who are well-adapted to the needs of building the 
socialist market economy. Earnest efforts should be made to 
strengthen basic education, reinforce compulsory education, and 
prevent the loss of middle and primary school students, 
especially those in rural areas. With a view to finding a 
fundamental solution to the problem of the arbitrary collection 
of fees and of adding to the heavy burdens of middle and primary 
school students, we must adopt resolute measures to check the 
arbitrary editing, printing, and issuing of various kinds of 
review materials and exercise books. We should persistently 
take the road of running both government and non-government 
schools, and of integrating production with education; 
vigorously develop vocational and adult education; bring up 
technical personnel at both the intermediate and preliminary 
levels; and wipe out illiteracy among the young and middle-aged. 
Continued attention should be paid to the comprehensive reform 
of both the rural and urban educational systems. To do a good 
job in higher education, we should deepen reform, readjust the 
structure, and take the road of intense development. Efforts 
will be made to strengthen the building of the contingent of 
teachers, and to attract more outstanding talents to work as 
teachers. We will continue to increase input into education and 
to check the diversion of educational funds. All social forces 
should be encouraged to run schools in various forms and at 
different levels according to the law. 
  Cultural organs, press and publications, as well as radios, 
films, and television should publicize the main theme of our 
times, and should provide sound services for the building of the 
two socialist civilizations. Efforts will be made to reform the 
cultural structure (especially the structure of art ensembles), 
pay major attention to the cultural building of rural areas, 
bring about the further development of cultural undertakings, 
control culture through the law, and improve people with 
culture. It is imperative to uphold the principle of "serving 
the party and the people" and the principle of "letting a 
hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of thought to 
contend"; to carry out and perfect cultural and economic 
policies; to place the social efficiency of spiritual products 
in a primary position; and to publish more good books, create 
more good works, and perform more outstanding plays so as to 
boost the socialist new culture of the Chinese nation and bring 
a new culture to Sichuan. We will extensively carry out mass 
sports activities in both urban and rural areas, strengthen 
physical education in schools, and pay attention to the 
development of athletic sports. 
  Strides will be taken to comprehensively deepen reform of 
health and sanitation work; to earnestly strengthen preventive 
health care, improve health care services in rural areas, and 
push forward public health work in nationality areas; to 
rejuvenate traditional Chinese medicine; and to bring about the 
sound development of health and medical undertakings. It is 
necessary to uphold the principle of relying mainly on 
prevention; to pay attention to preventing and curing serious 
diseases that endanger the lives of the masses; and to strive to 
bring down the general incidence rate of various contagious, 
endemic, and pediatric and gynecological diseases. We will 
carry out in depth the patriotic health campaign in urban areas, 
and push forward the building of cities and counties that are 
outstanding in health care. By carrying out the "three 
constructions," we will make vigorous efforts to strengthen 
rural health and sanitary work, especially primary health care 
in rural areas. 
  We will unswervingly pay attention to family planning, 
comprehensively carry out the "Sichuan Province Regulations on 
Family Planning," stabilize population control policies, 
strengthen management over birth control among the migrant 
population, and bring both the birth rate and the natural growth 
rate of the population well below 18.69 and 11.66 per thousand, 
respectively. It is imperative to manage land resources 
according to the law, to accelerate the pace of reform in the 
land use system, and gradually to standardize and develop the 
real estate market. We need to do a good job in environmental 
protection, and to try to harness the environment of such 
regions as the Tuo Jiang Valley and the mainstream of the Chang 
Jiang. 
  In accordance with the requirements of building socialism 
with Chinese characteristics, we will conscientiously make 
greater contributions to bringing out economic development and 
social progress by attaining success in such fields as 
personnel, care for the elderly, statistics, meteorology, 
seismology, survey and mapping, civil air defense, archives, 
annals complilation, literature, history, and security. 

<H5>    8. Promote unity among all nationalities; accelerate </H5>
the economic development of old revolutionary bases, areas 
inhabited by minority nationalities, border areas, and 
poverty-stricken areas. 
  Efforts will be made to carry out the party's nationality 
policy in a comprehensive manner, to uphold and perfect the 
system of regional autonomy for minority nationalities, and to 
augment unity among all nationalities. Work will be done to 
vigorously explore and develop the economy of nationality 
regions by accelerating the growth rate of general supply and 
demand, paying major attention to the structure of dominant 
industries, granting preferential policies, and by providing 
them with greater capital support. It is necessary to 
accelerate infrastructure construction, including transport and 
telecommunications, and to do a good job in the supply of 
commodities to meet special needs. Continued efforts will be 
made to help nationality regions promote such social 
undertakings as education, science and technology, culture, 
radio and television, and public health, and to enhance the 
cultural, scientific and technological, and health levels of 
peasants and herdsmen. 
  It is imperative to continue carrying out the aid-the-poor 
work, and to expedite the economic development of old 
revolutionary bases, nationality regions, border areas, and 
poverty-stricken areas. Efforts will be taken to implement the 
"1987" [ba qi 0360 0003] Aid-the-Poor Program, pool aid-the-poor 
funds, grant special preferential policies to extremely 
difficult townships in poor areas, and change aid-the-poor work 
from social relief into production-based development. We should 
do a good job in giving unit-to-unit mutual support, and in 
expanding the economic and technological coordination between 
poor areas and cities, including Chengdu and Chongqing. It is 
necessary to carry out policies and measures aiming at promoting 
development in different areas, mutual complementarity, and 
benefit sharing, and to pay simultaneous attention to projects 
to "bring about a better life than one with merely sufficient 
food and clothing," to work to extricate our people from poverty 
through production and development, and to work to make people 
and counties rich. 
  Efforts will be made to carry out comprehensively the 
party's 
policy toward religions, to strengthen management over religious 
affairs according to the law, to firmly oppose hostile forces 
and splittists who attempt to use religion to carry out 
infiltration and sabotage, and to safeguard the national unity 
and unification of our motherland. 
<H5>  9. Reinforce democracy and legal system, strengthen the </H5>
building of spiritual civilization, and safeguard social 
stability. 
  A high degree of democracy and a perfect legal system are 
fundamental guarantees for the long-term peace and stability of 
a country. We should unremittingly strengthen socialist 
democracy and the building of the legal system under the 
leadership of the Communist Party. As the executive organs of 
the people's congresses at all levels, governments at all levels 
should respect the functions of the people's congresses, 
implement resolutions adopted by them, and subject themselves to 
their supervision. We should consolidate and promote the 
patriotic united front during the new period; uphold and perfect 
multiparty cooperation and the system of political consultation 
under the leadership of the Communist Party; take the initiative 
to consult and discuss with the CPPCC, as well as with 
democratic parties, non-party figures, and mass bodies; 
conscientiously receive their supervision; and systematize and 
regularize the practice. We need to handle promptly the 
opinions, suggestions, motions, and bills submitted by people's 
deputies and CPPCC members, and to heed carefully the opinions 
of the masses. It is necessary to bring into full play the 
roles and functions of advisers, counselors, and advisory 
bodies, and to attach importance to handling the letters and 
visits of the masses. 
  The establishment of a socialist market economy structure 
urgently requires the guidance, standards, guarantees, and 
restrictions of a perfect socialist legal system. Therefore, we 
should regard the government's legal building as the foundation 
of its work, fulfill all the responsibilities entrusted to our 
government by the law, handle official business in strict 
accordance with the law, and ensure that the government can 
function with a high efficiency within the orbit of a legal 
system. It is imperative to coordinate the standing committee 
of the provincial people's congress in local legislation, 
especially economic legislation. We should promptly adopt local 
economic regulations and administrative rules urgently needed by 
the development of the market economy, amend and abolish 
outdated local rules and regulations, and ensure consistency 
between the legal system and government orders. Efforts will be 
taken to strengthen the enforcement of administrative laws, to 
rectify the contingent of administrative law-enforcement 
personnel, to standardize the administrative law-enforcing 
behavior of major administrative law- enforcement bodies, to 
crack down on major law-breaking administrative behaviors, and 
to safeguard the fairness and truthfulness of administrative 
law-enforcement organs. Continued strides will be taken to 
carry out the second five-year plan on universal legal 
education; to study, obey, use, and enforce laws; and to 
reinforce the legal concepts of the vast cadres and masses. It 
is imperative to accelerate reform in the system of legal 
practitioners and notaries, and to provide the public with 
satisfactory legal services. 
  Earnest efforts should be made to strengthen comprehensive 
control over social security. It is necessary to act in 
accordance with the principle that "whoever takes charge should 
take responsibility"; to encourage all social sectors to impose 
concerted control over public security; to carry out 
comprehensive control measures down to the level of villages, 
neighborhoods, enterprises, schools, administrative 
institutions, and residential quarters, as well as to take 
precautions against possible troubles. Work should be done to 
give full play to the role and functions of public security and 
judicial administrative organs, to act in close coordination 
with procuratorial and judicial organs, to focus our attention 
on special-purpose campaigns, to strike relentless blows at 
various crimes and at major economic criminal activities, and to 
hand down severe punishments to a number of lawbreakers 
according to the law. Struggles against pornography and the "six 
evils" should be carried out continuously, with a view to 
resolutely eliminating all evil social phenomena. We should 
handle correctly the contradictions among the people during the 
new period; try to solve these contradictions in a positive way 
through prevention, education, management, and construction; 
stabilize society and popular feelings; and create a sound 
social environment for reform, opening up, and the modernization 
drive. Fire control should be reinforced and safety measures 
adopted. 
  Continued efforts should be made to enhance the 
consciousness 
in "doing two types of work simultaneously, and attaching equal 
importance to both"; to firmly grasp the main theme of 
cultivating people with ideals, morality, culture, and disciple; 
and to carry out our work in a down-to-earth manner. We will 
organize the vast numbers of cadres, especially leading cadres 
at all levels, to conscientiously study the "Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping," volume three; to arm our minds with his theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics; and to turn 
this theory into the spiritual pillar of the entire nation. We 
will carry out extensive education on patriotism, collectivism, 
socialism, and the 64-character pioneering spirit advocated by 
Comrade Jiang Zemin, and will guide people -- especially 
teenagers and young people -- to carry forward the traditional 
virtues of the Chinese nation and cultivate correct ideals and 
beliefs, as well as outlooks on the world, life, and values. We 
should have a clear-cut stand on opposing money worship, 
out-and-out egoism, and decadent lifestyles. Work should be 
done to strengthen management over the cultural market through 
legal, economic, and administrative means, as well as through 
media supervision; to maintain sound control over the two links 
of production and circulation; never to allow vulgar things to 
erode the general mood of society; to resolutely ban 
compensatory news coverage, as well as the purchase and sale of 
registered publication serial numbers; to firmly eliminate the 
publication of materials that violate state policies toward 
minority nationalities and religions; and to hand down 
punishment to those who distribute publications that contain 
serious political mistakes, leak state secrets, or include 
pornographic content. Continued efforts will be made to carry 
out the activity of building civilized cities, units, villages, 
and townships, as well as the activities of "three promotions" 
and "three kinds of households" in rural areas. Close attention 
needs to be paid to the protection and utilization of cultural 
relics. 
  Strides should be taken to strengthen education among all 
the 
people on national defense so as to enhance people's national 
defense awareness; to build up more exemplary cities and 
counties in providing "two supports"; to augment unity between 
the Army and the government, and between the Army and the 
people; and to do a good job in resettling ex-servicemen and 
soldiers transferred to civilian work, as well as in the reserve 
service of the militia. 
<H5>  10. Strengthen the building of clean and industrious </H5>
administration, and push forward structural reform of the 
government 
  Our governments at all levels are governments for the 
people, 
and therefore should serve the people, heart and soul. All 
government workers are servants of the people who should be 
clean and self- disciplined, diligent in carrying out their 
official duties, and willing to be dedicated. All our cadres 
should voluntarily subject themselves to the legal supervision 
of the people's congress, the democratic supervision of the 
CPPCC, and supervision by the vast numbers of the masses and the 
media, and should become real servants of the people and real 
pioneers of economic and social construction. 
  Continued efforts should be made to strengthen the building 
of a clean government, and carry out the in-depth struggle 
against corruption. We should strictly enforce laws, administer 
the government in a persistent manner, give education on how to 
fight corruption, advocate clean administration, and urge 
leading cadres at all levels to remain clean and 
self-disciplined in the exercise of their official duties. 
Across the province, leading cadres at and above the county 
(departmental) level should resolutely abide by the five 
requirements on clean administration and self discipline which 
the CPC Central Committee has set for the leading cadres of both 
party and government organs. It is imperative to step up 
supervision by supervisory and auditing departments, continue 
investigations into major and serious cases, and hand down 
severe punishment to degenerates. Continued efforts should be 
made to carry out special-purpose campaigns, and to put an 
absolute end to unhealthy trends that are strongly opposed by 
the people and that have hampered the image of the people's 
government, such as abuse of power for personal gain through the 
arbitrary collection of funds. Administrative discipline needs 
to be reinforced so as to ensure the smooth implementation of 
government orders. 
  Governments at all levels should do their work in accordance 
with the requirements of the party Central Committee and the 
State Council on the structural reform of local government 
organs, draw up implementation plans according to realistic 
local conditions, and put these plans into practice step by 
step. In drawing up and implementing plans for the structural 
reform of government organs, we must fully expound and prove the 
necessity of the reform, extensively heed the opinions of all 
social sectors, conscientiously carry out ideological and 
political work, try our best to resettle surplus personnel 
through various channels, and ensure a normal work order. 
  The structural reform of government organs should be carried 
out in accordance with the principle of separating the roles of 
the government from the functions of enterprises, as well as the 
principles of efficient and simple administration, unity, and 
efficiency, with a view to changing the functions and roles of 
such organs, rationalizing relations, streamlining the 
administrative structure, and enhancing work efficiency. It is 
necessary to reduce the numbers of staff and internal organs, 
and to reinforce the functions of such organs in macroeconomic 
control and regulation, social security, and supervision. This 
year, we will focus our attention on the structural reform of 
administrative organs at the provincial level, while 
experimenting further with the structural reform of organs at 
the county level. Newly established cities and prefectures 
should determine their functions, organizational structures, and 
establishment according to structural reform plans that have 
been approved already. Other prefectures, cities, autonomous 
prefectures, and counties also should make good preparations for 
the structural reform. The logistical services of 
administrative organs should be socialized. It is necessary to 
reinforce the organizational construction of grass-roots organs 
of political power and grass-roots organizations, and to pay 
close attention to the follow-up work in abolishing 
administrative districts, merging townships, and establishing 
towns. 
  The structural reform of government organs has a direct 
bearing on our country's economic development and social 
stability, and also on the immediate interests of the vast 
numbers of cadres and staff. It is imperative, therefore, to 
positively and steadily put into practice the civil service 
system under the prerequisite that governments at all levels 
have determined their functions, organizational structure, and 
establishment. 
  We should carry out persistent investigations and studies 
with the aim of enhancing the scientific level of policy 
decisions made by the government. Government organs at all 
levels should change their work style and methods, advocate the 
practice of carrying out investigations and studies, and remain 
industrious in carrying out official duties in a down-to-earth 
manner. Leading cadres should go down to the grass-roots level 
to acquaint themselves with the real situations there and obtain 
first-hand information; they should discuss with the masses when 
encountering problems, closely integrate the spirit of the 
central authorities with local realistic conditions, and strive 
to attain the goal of seeking truth from facts and of making 
policy decisions in a democratic and scientific way. We should 
attach great importance to the work of consultation organs, 
which help in making policy decisions. It is imperative to 
uphold and perfect the target management system in 
administrative organs, strengthen administrative supervision, 
and try to enhance the efficiency and quality of our work. 
  Comrade Jiang Zemin has pointed out: "Our socialist 
modernization construction still remains at a pioneering stage 
of difficult struggle, and our great pioneering practice still 
requires the support and encouragement of a great pioneering 
spirit." We should give wide publicity among all cadres to the 
spirit of doing pioneering work with arduous efforts, and should 
carry forward all the traditional virtues of the Chinese nation 
in rejuvenating the country through difficult struggle. All 
state workers should follow the example of Mao Zedong, Zhou 
Enlai, and other proletarian revolutionaries of the older 
generation; try to be the first to bear hardships and the last 
to enjoy comforts in the great practice of reform, opening up, 
and the modernization drive; spare no effort in performing their 
duties; and strive to turn themselves into good servants of the 
people. 
  Fellow deputies: 
  Reform and development are the main theme of our times. As 
long as we uphold as our guidance Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics; persistently 
carry out the party's basic line; conscientiously implement the 
spirit of the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee under the leadership of the party Central Committee, 
the State Council, and the Sichuan Provincial CPC Committee; 
forge ahead in unity; have the courage to open up new paths; and 
carry out our work in a down- to-earth manner, we surely can 
bring to Sichuan sustained, rapid, and healthy economic 
development, as well as comprehensive social progress, and 
surely can realize the goals of our struggle. 

